Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,131
Notice to the Attorney General.

(a) A public benefit or religious corporation shall give the Attorney General written notice that it intends to dissolve at or before the time it delivers articles of dissolution to the Secretary of State. The notice shall include a copy or summary of the plan of dissolution.

(b) No assets shall be transferred or conveyed by a public benefit or religious corporation as part of the dissolution process until twenty days after it has given the written notice required by subsection (a) of this section to the Attorney General or until the Attorney General has consented in writing to the dissolution or indicated in writing that he or she will take no action with respect to the transfer or conveyance, whichever is earlier.

(c) When all or substantially all of the assets of a public benefit corporation have been transferred or conveyed following approval of dissolution, the board shall deliver to the Attorney General a list showing those (other than creditors) to whom the assets were transferred or conveyed. The list shall indicate the addresses of each person (other than creditors) who received assets and indicate what assets each received.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 131.